Louisiana, session 2026, SB340.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1703.1(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1703.1. Permanent registration of homestead exemption; designated parishes
A. The tax assessor of each parish for the parishes of Acadia, Allen,
Ascension, Assumption, Avoyelles, Beauregard, Bienville, Caddo, Calcasieu,
Caldwell, Cameron, Catahoula, Claiborne, Concordia, DeSoto, East Baton Rouge,
East Carroll, East Feliciana, Evangeline, Franklin, Grant, Iberia, Iberville, Jackson,
Jefferson, Jefferson Davis, Lafayette, Lafourche, LaSalle, Lincoln, Livingston,
Morehouse, Natchitoches, Orleans, Ouachita, Pointe Coupee, Rapides, Red River,
Richland, Sabine, St. Bernard, St. Helena, St. James, St. John the Baptist, St. Landry,
St. Martin, St. Mary, St. Tammany, Tangipahoa, Tensas, Terrebonne, Union,
Vermilion, Vernon, Washington, Webster, West Baton Rouge, West Carroll, West
Feliciana, and Winn shall provide a form to property owners within the parish for
permanent registration for the benefits of the homestead exemption provided for in
R.S. 47:1703.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 340 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.